Arkansas, session 2025, HB1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 18, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-18-315. Written legal opinions — Issuance.
A written legal opinion issued by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration or the Department of Finance and Administration as
required by law or under the rules promulgated by the department shall be
issued within:
*JLL160*
02/18/2025 12:28:42 PM JLL160

HB1520
(1) Ninety (90) days of the secretary or the department
receiving a written request for the written legal opinion; or
(2) Forty-five (45) days of the secretary or the department
receiving a written request for renewal of a legal opinion previously issued
by the secretary or the department if there has been no change in the
statutory law, court interpretation, or department rules affecting the legal
opinion previously issued by the secretary or the department.





























02/18/2025 12:28:42 PM JLL160